Maine, session 132, LD1038.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2423-B, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2021, c. 662, §19 and c.
669, §5, is further amended to read:
3. Expiration. A written certification form for the medical use of cannabis under this
section is valid for the a term provided by the qualifying patient's medical provider, which
must be included in the written certification and which may not exceed one year of 2 years.